Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1423.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Repeal Section 41-3026.10, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3036.10, to read: START_STATUTE41-3036.10. Western interstate commission for higher education; termination July 1, 2036 A. The western interstate commission for higher education terminates on July 1, 2036. B. Title 15, chapter 13, article 8 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2037. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the western interstate commission for higher education to enter into agreements with institutions in the region offering graduate or professional education or with compacting states or territories to provide adequate services and facilities for graduate and professional education for citizens of this state. Sec. 4. Retroactivity Sections 1 and 2 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.